Utah statutes.
16-11-15.   Incorporation under Utah Revised Business Corporation Act
permitted -- Existing corporations may come under Professional Corporation
Act.
This act shall not preclude incorporation by professional persons under Title
16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, where such persons
would be permitted to organize a corporation and perform professional services
by means of such corporation in the absence of this act.  This act shall not
apply to any corporation organized by such persons prior to the passage of
this act, but any such persons or any such corporation may bring themselves
and such corporation within the provisions of this act by amending the
articles of incorporation in such a manner as to be consistent with all of the
provisions of this act and by affirmatively stating in the amended articles of
incorporation that the shareholders have elected to bring the corporation
within the provisions of this act.
